Utah statutes.
53A-12-104.   Notice of student fees and waivers.

A local school board shall annually give written notice of its student fee schedules and fee waiver policies to the parent or guardian of a child who attends a public school within the district. 



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

